ja: インゴット形状: バー; コイン; ラウンド; その他
sl-SI: Oblika naložbenega zlata: Palice; Kovanci; Okrogle ploščice; Drugo
lt-LT: Luito forma: Pailgi; Monetos; Apvalūs; Kita
el: Μορφή χρυσού: Ράβδοι; Νομίσματα; Κέρματα; Άλλο
th: รูปแบบทองคำแท่ง: แท่ง; เหรียญ; เหรียญเล็ก; อื่นๆ
tr: Külçe Formu: Barlar; Paralar; Turlar; Diğer
hr-HR: Oblik poluge plemenitih metala: Poluge; Kovanice; Zlatnici; Ostalo
fr: Forme du lingot: Barres; Pièces de monnaie; Manches; Autre
sk-SK: Forma nerazeného kovu: Tehličky; Mince; Kruhy; Iné
bg-BG: Форма на кюлчета: Кюлче; Монети; Кръгове; Други
pt-BR: Forma de barra de ouro ou prata: Barras; Moedas; Redondas; Outro
pt-PT: Forma das barras de metais valiosos: Barras; Moedas; Redondo; Outro
vi: Dạng vàng bạc: Thanh; Đồng xu; Vòng tròn; Khác
nl: Goud- en zilverstavenvorm: Staven; Munten; Rondjes; Andere
de: Edelmetallform: Barren; Münzen; Rundbarren; Sonstiges
pl: Forma kruszcu: Sztabki; Monety; Krążki; Inne
it: Forma del lingotto: Sbarre; Monete; Tondo; Altro
ko: 괴 형태: 바; 동전; 원형; 기타
zh-TW: 金銀形式: 金條; 硬幣; 圓形銀幣; 其他
da: Bullion-form: Barer; Mønter; Runder; Andet
fi: Harkon muoto: Harkko; Kolikot; Laatat; Muu
sv: Form på tackor: Tackor; Mynt; Medaljonger; Övrigt
zh-CN: 贵金属形状: 金条; 硬币; 圆形; 其他
en: Bullion form: Bars; Coins; Rounds; Other
nb: Bullionform: Barrer; Mynter; Runder; Annet
ru: Форма банковского металла: Слитки; Монеты; Круглые; Другое
ro-RO: Formă lingouri: Lingouri; Monede; Monede de aur pentru investiție (rounds); Altele
hu: Nemesfémtömb formája: Rudak; Aprópénz; Érmék; Egyéb
es: Forma del lingote: Barras; Monedas; Rondas; Otros
cs: Forma investičních drahých kovů: Cihly; Mince; Medaile; Jiné